District of Columbia statutes.
50-301.11

Full Commission meetings; annual report.

(a)

The chairperson shall be responsible for, and shall assure coordination and communication between, the Commission and any appointed panel. All members of the Commission shall be kept apprised of the business of the full Commission.

(b)

The chairperson shall call a meeting of the full Commission periodically, but no less than once every 2 months, to discuss general affairs of the Commission and matters pertaining to the vehicle-for-hire industry, to establish and set general policies of the full Commission, and to outline goals and future directions of the Commission. Meetings of the full Commission shall include the participation of other governmental agencies involved in taxicab administration, such as the Metropolitan Police Department, the Office of Taxicabs, and the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Commission.

(b-1)

Repealed.

(c)

The full Commission shall make an annual report to the Council during its annual public oversight and budget hearings. The report shall contain, but not be limited to, information and statistics relating to licensing, enforcement, the status of taxicab equipment, estimated industry revenues, and passenger carriage, and shall outline briefly the activities and goals of the Commission.

(d)

The full Commission shall periodically evaluate program development and implementation at the hacker’s license training course and may issue policy directives pertaining to program content and program direction.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 12, 33 DCR 703
Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 2602(b), 49 DCR 6968
Oct. 22, 2012, D.C. Law 19-184, § 2(l), 59 DCR 9431
Mar. 10, 2015, D.C. Law 20-197, § 2(e), 61 DCR 12430
1981 Ed., § 40-1711.
2001 Ed., § 50-311.
D.C. Law 14-190 added subsec. (b-1)
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-184 substituted “the Commission and any appointed panel” for “both panels of the Commission, and shall have authority to resolve disputes and issues of jurisdiction arising between panels” in (a); and substituted “Council during its annual public oversight and budget hearings” for “Mayor and the Council on or before the 2nd Monday of January each year” in (c).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-197 substituted “vehicle-for-hire industry” for “taxicab industry” in (b); and repealed (b-1).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2502(b) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-453, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8026).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-184, § 7, see § 7007 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-184, § 7, see § 7007 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 7001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle A of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Subject to Appropriations Repealers Amendment Act of 2013”.
Section 24(b) of D.C. Law 6-97 provided that sections 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 20, 21, 22, and 23 shall take effect 1 year after March 25, 1986.

Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-184 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 7007 of D.C. Law 20-61 repealed D.C. Law 19-184, § 7.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-197: Section 7 of D.C. Law 20-197 provided, in part, that §§ 1, 2, 3, and 4 of the act shall apply as of March 10, 2015.